Tennessee, session 114, SB0491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-23-114, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(g) For purposes of carrying out a sentence of death, lethal injection protocol
may include the use of pharmaceutical fentanyl.
SECTION 2. For purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2025, the
public welfare requiring it.
SB0491
000695
- 1 -